District of Columbia statutes.
47-1385

Transition provisions; applicability of chapter.

Chapter 13 [of this title] shall apply to any tax sale made or instituted, and any agreement executed between the District and any third party with respect to such sale, before January 1, 2001. This chapter shall apply to any tax sale made or instituted (or which could have been made or instituted), and any agreement executed between the District and any third party with respect to such sale, after December 31, 2000.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334

D.C. Law 20-141, effective Dec. 4, 2014, would have added § 47-1390, concerning the Office of Real Property Tax Sale Review; however, D.C. Law 20-141 was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.

§ 47-1390 Office of Real Property Sale Review. [Repealed].

[Repealed.]

(Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 101(c)(32)(A), 61 DCR 7763; Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.)

D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).